Maine, session 132, LD1920.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §2231, sub-§1-A, ¶F is enacted to read:
F. "Nonintoxicating cannabinoid" means:
(1) Cannabidiol, also known as "CBD";
(2) Tetrahydrocannabivarin, also known as "THCV";
(3) Cannabichromene, also known as "CBC";
(4) Cannabicitran, also known as "CBTC";
(5) Cannabicyclol, also known as "CBL";
Page 1 - 132LR1662(04)

(6) Cannabielsoin, also known as "CBE";
(7) Cannabigerol, also known as "CBG";
(8) Cannabidivarin, also known as "CBDV"; and
(9) Cannabinol, also known as "CBN."
Sec. 2. 7 MRSA §2231, sub-§1-A, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. "Potentially intoxicating cannabinoids" include the following:
(1) Delta-10-tetrahydrocannabinol and its isomers;
(2) Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol and its isomers;
(3) Delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol and its isomers;
(4) Delta-7-tetrahydrocannabinol and its isomers;
(5) Delta-6a,10a-tetrahydrocannabinol and its isomers;
(6) Exo-tetrahydrocannabinol;
(7) Metabolites of tetrahydrocannabinol, including 11-hydroxy-
tetrahydrocannabinol, 3'-hydroxy-tetrahydrocannabinol and 7-hydroxy-delta-
tetrahydrocannabinol;
(8) Hydrogenated forms of tetrahydrocannabinol, including hexahydrocannabinol,
hexahydrocannabiphorol and hexahydrocannabihexol;
(9) Synthetic forms of tetrahydrocannabinol, including dronabinol;
(10) Ester forms of tetrahydrocannabinol, including delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol-
O-acetate, delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol-O-acetate and hexahydrocannabinol-O-
acetate;
(11) Varin forms of tetrahydrocannabinol, including delta-8-
tetrahydrocannabivarin but excluding delta-9-tetrahydrocannabivarin; and
(12) Analogs of tetrahydrocannabinols with an alkyl chain of 4 or more carbon
atoms, including tetrahydrocannabiphorols, tetrahydrocannabioctyls,
tetrahydrocannabihexols and tetrahydrocannabutols.
Sec. 3. 7 MRSA §2231, sub-§1-A, ¶H is enacted to read:
H. "Potentially intoxicating hemp product" means any products derived from hemp
and ingestible consumer products, including food, food additives, food products and
beverages derived from hemp, that in their final forms do not contain:
(1) A concentration of less than 0.3% potentially intoxicating cannabinoids; and
(2) A ratio of more than 10:1 of nonintoxicating cannabinoids to potentially
intoxicating cannabinoids.
Sec. 4. 7 MRSA §2231, sub-§12 is enacted to read:
12. Potentially intoxicating hemp products; prohibited sales. A potentially
intoxicating hemp product may not be sold to a person who has not attained 21 years of
age.
Sec. 5. 7 MRSA §2231, sub-§13 is enacted to read:
Page 2 - 132LR1662(04)

13. Packaging and labeling requirements. This subsection governs packaging and
labeling requirements for hemp products.
A. A potentially intoxicating hemp product that is not a beverage, salve or topical
product must be packaged in child-resistant and tamper-evident packaging.
B. A hemp product may not be labeled or packaged in violation of a federal trademark
law or regulation or in a manner that would cause a reasonable consumer confusion as
to whether the item was a different trademarked product.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 3 - 132LR1662(04)